Hawaii statutes.
§425E-102 Definitions. As
used in this chapter:

"Certificate of limited partnership"
means the certificate required by section
425E-201. The term includes the certificate as amended or restated.

"Contribution", except in the phrase
"right of contribution", means any benefit provided by a person to a
limited partnership in order to become a partner or in the person's capacity as
a partner.

"Debtor in bankruptcy" means a person
that is the subject of:

(1) An order for relief under Title 11 of the United
States Code or a comparable order under a successor statute of general
application; or

(2) A comparable order under federal, state, or
foreign law governing insolvency.

"Director" means the director of the
department of commerce and consumer affairs.

"Distribution" means a transfer of
money or other property from a limited partnership to a partner in the
partner's capacity as a partner or to a transferee on account of a transferable
interest owned by the transferee.

"Entity" includes domestic and foreign
corporations, domestic professional corporations, domestic and foreign limited
liability companies, domestic and foreign nonprofit corporations, domestic and
foreign business trusts, estates, domestic and foreign partnerships, domestic
and foreign limited partnerships, domestic and foreign limited liability
partnerships, trusts, two or more persons having joint or common economic
interest, associations and cooperative associations, and state, federal, and
foreign governments.

"Foreign limited liability limited
partnership" means a foreign limited partnership whose general partners
have limited liability for the obligations of the foreign limited partnership
under a provision similar to section 425E-404(c).

"Foreign limited partnership" means a
partnership formed under the laws of a jurisdiction other than this State and
required by those laws to have one or more general partners and one or more
limited partners. The term includes a foreign limited liability limited
partnership.

"General partner" means:

(1) With respect to a limited partnership, a person
that:

(A) Becomes a general partner under section
425E-401; or

(B) Was a general partner in a limited
partnership when the limited partnership became subject to this chapter under
section 425E-1204(a) or (b); and

(2) With respect to a foreign limited partnership, a
person that has rights, powers, and obligations similar to those of a general
partner in a limited partnership.

"Individual" means a natural person.

"Limited liability limited partnership",
except in the phrase "foreign limited liability limited partnership",
means a limited partnership whose certificate of limited partnership states
that the limited partnership is a limited liability limited partnership.

"Limited partner" means:

(1) With respect to a limited partnership, a person
that:

(A) Becomes a limited partner under section
425E-301; or

(B) Was a limited partner in a limited
partnership when the limited partnership became subject to this chapter under
section 425E-1204(a) or (b); and

(2) With respect to a foreign limited partnership, a
person that has rights, powers, and obligations similar to those of a limited
partner in a limited partnership.

"Limited partnership", except in the
phrases "foreign limited partnership" and "foreign limited
liability limited partnership", means an entity, having one or more
general partners and one or more limited partners, which is formed under this
chapter by two or more persons or becomes subject to this chapter under article
11 or section 425E-1204(a) or (b). The term includes a limited liability
limited partnership.

"Partner" means a limited partner or
general partner.

"Partnership agreement" means the
partners' agreement, whether oral, implied, in a record, or in any combination,
concerning the limited partnership. The term includes the agreement as
amended.

"Person" includes any individual or
entity.

"Person dissociated as a general
partner" means a person dissociated as a general partner of a limited
partnership.

"Principal office" means the office
where the principal executive office of a limited partnership or foreign
limited partnership is located, whether or not the office is located in this
State.

"Record" means information that is
inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other
medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

"Registered office" means the office
that a domestic or foreign limited partnership is required to register and
maintain under section 425E-114.

"Required information" means the
information that a limited partnership is required to maintain under section
425E-111.

"Sign" means to execute or adopt a
tangible symbol with the present intent to authenticate a record or to attach
or logically associate an electronic symbol, sound, or process to or with a
record with the present intent to authenticate the record.

"State" means a state of the United
States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin
Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of
the United States.

"This State" means the State of Hawaii.

"Transfer" includes an assignment,
conveyance, deed, bill of sale, lease, mortgage, security interest,
encumbrance, gift, and transfer by operation of law.

"Transferable interest" means a
partner's right to receive distributions.

"Transferee" means a person to which
all or part of a transferable interest has been transferred, whether or not the
transferor is a partner. [L 2003, c 210, pt of §1; am L 2004, c 121, §35; am L
2006, c 184, §20]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next